Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5565.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 11. (1) Subject to subsection (2), a person shall not engage in the business of providing deferred presentment service transactions after June 1, 2006 without a license under this act. A separate license is required for each location from which the business of providing deferred presentment service transactions is conducted. (2) This act does not apply to a any of the following: (a) A state or nationally chartered bank or a state or federally chartered savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union whose deposits or member accounts are insured by an agency of the United States government. (b) A person that is licensed under the earned wage access services act, to the extent of its operation as a licensee under the earned wage access services act. (3) By January 1, 2006, the commissioner by administrative bulletin, order, or rule shall establish an application process and an application timeline for license applications under this act. (4) A person may continue to engage in the business of providing deferred presentment service transactions in this state after June 1, 2006 and without a license until 1 of the following occurs: (a) The person fails to meet its applications deadline. (b) The commissioner acts on the person's complete application. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5558 (request no. H04676'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.